Kentucky statutes. TITLE VII Public Property and Public Printing
Appropriation — Survey — Land Office

56.190.
What lands may be appropriated — Effect of previous entry, survey or patent.

Only vacant lands may be appropriated under KRS

56.200

to

56.240

. Land that has escheated to the state, or has been forfeited for failure to list it for taxation or for nonpayment of taxes, or has been legally and validly patented before, is not vacant land.

Every entry, survey, or patent is void insofar as it embraces land previously entered, surveyed, or patented, unless the previous entry, survey, or patent itself is void; in which case the first subsequent lawful entry, survey, or patent, whether issued before, on, or after June 13, 1944, shall be valid and be accorded the same force and effect it would have been entitled to have been accorded, had the void entry, survey, or patent never been issued.

History.

4704: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 94.

56.200.
Actual settler — Preemption right.

An actual settler on any vacant and unappropriated land has a preemption right to any number of acres, not exceeding one hundred (100), to be laid-off as nearly as possible in a square, his improvements in the center. Before any other person shall locate the same land, three (3) months’ notice of intention to do so must be given to the actual settler, describing the land intended to be taken up or appropriated. If the actual settler does not, within three (3) months from the giving of such notice, have the land entered and surveyed preparatory to obtaining a patent for it, the person giving the notice may enter and survey the land and proceed to obtain the patent.

History.

4703.

56.210.
Lands, how appropriated — Disposition of proceeds.

Any person who wishes to appropriate any vacant and unappropriated land may, by applying to the county judge/executive of the county in which the land lies, and paying therefor a price fixed by the fiscal court at not less than five dollars ($5) per hundred (100) acres, obtain an order authorizing him to enter and survey any number of acres of such land in the county, not to exceed two hundred (200). The party obtaining the order may, by an entry in the surveyor’s book of the county, describing the land, appropriate the quantity of land it calls for in one (1) or more parcels; but no one (1) person shall enter, survey or cause to be patented more than two hundred (200) acres of land in any one (1) county. The proceeds of the sale shall be paid into the county treasury.

History.

4702, 4703: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 125, effective June 17, 1978.

56.220.
Lands in Ohio River bed.

All that portion of the bed of the Ohio River, lying north of the thread of the stream, except accretions to islands privately owned, is declared to be vacant and unappropriated land, and the county judge/executive of each county bordering on the Ohio River may use or lease the river bed for county purposes, upon such terms and conditions as to him seem beneficial to the county. Any contract of leasing made by any such county judge/executive of such river bed for any sand and gravel rights for or on behalf of the county conveys full right and title to the lessee to the exclusive use of all sand and gravel deposits in the river bed to the extent embraced in the lease.

History.

4702, 4703: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 126, effective June 17, 1978.

56.230.
Survey, plat and certificate — Issue of patent.

The surveyor shall survey the entries in the order in which they are made, bounding each entry by plainly marked trees, stones or stakes, noting where it binds on a watercourse or the marked line of another survey, and giving names. The survey shall be made in the presence of two (2) disinterested housekeepers as chainmen, whose names shall be placed at the bottom of the plat and certificate. Each survey must be made within six (6) months after the date of the entry. A plat and certificate of the survey shall be made out by the surveyor and recorded in his books, and the original thereof and a copy of the order of court under which it is made shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State within six (6) months after the survey is made.

When the survey is carried into grant, the Secretary of State shall write across the face of the order on which the survey was made “satisfied,” and sign his name to it. The legal title to the land shall vest in the patentee as of the time the survey is made, unless the plat and certificate of survey are filed more than six (6) months after the survey is made, in which case the legal title shall vest in the patentee as of the date of the patent.

Plats and certificates are assignable, regardless of when made or when assigned, and the assignment authorizes a patent to issue to the assignee. Land warrants are not assignable.

No patent shall be issued for more than two hundred (200) acres to any one (1) person in any one (1) county.

History.

4015, 4016, 4704.

56.240.
Affidavits of applicant and surveyor.

Before the surveyor permits the entry of any land for survey and patent, and before he surveys any land for the purpose of obtaining a patent thereon, he shall require the party desiring the entry and survey made to file with him an affidavit to the effect that the land has not, to the applicant’s knowledge or belief, been previously entered, surveyed or patented, in whole or in part, and that the land is vacant and unappropriated. The surveyor shall forward to the Secretary of State, with his plat and certificate of the land, his own affidavit to the effect that the land has not, to the surveyor’s knowledge or belief, been previously, in whole or in part, entered or surveyed for patent or patented.

History.

4705.

56.245.
Caveats, entry of and proceedings.

If any person obtains a survey of land to which another claims a better right, such other may enter a caveat with the register to prevent the issuing of a grant until the right be determined. The caveat shall state the plaintiff’s claim and the reasons why the grant should not issue. It shall be verified by his affidavit, or by that of his agent, and declare that it is entered in good faith, with the intention of procuring the land for the plaintiff, and not for the benefit of the person against whom it is entered.

A copy of the caveat, certified by the register, shall, within sixty (60) days from the time it is entered, be lodged with the clerk of the Circuit Court of the county where the land or the greater part thereof lies. Failure so to lodge such copy shall be deemed an abandonment of the caveat; and it may be disregarded by the register, upon the clerk’s certificate of such failure being filed in his office.

If such copy be lodged within said period, it shall be treated as a petition, and the proceedings upon it shall be the same, including an appeal to the Court of Appeals, as those in an ordinary action.

If the summons be not returned in due time, or be returned not executed, the caveat shall be dismissed, if it be shown that the nonexecution or nonreturn was procured by the plaintiff or resulted from his neglect.

A copy of the judgment, if in favor of the defendant, must be delivered into the land office within three (3) months from the time it is rendered; or a new caveat may, for that cause, be entered against the grant. If the judgment be for the plaintiff, and a copy thereof be not delivered into the land office within six (6) months from the time it was rendered, any other person may, for that cause, enter another caveat against the grant.

No grant shall issue to the land in contest, to the plaintiff in the caveat, or to another for his use, until the caveat be dismissed or decided; and any such grant, to the extent of such land, shall be void.

If the plaintiff does not prosecute his caveat as herein required, or if the same be dismissed or decided against him, neither he nor any other for his use shall have another caveat against the same grant.

The court may, in its discretion, require the plaintiff to give security for costs; and upon his failure to do so may dismiss the proceeding.

History.

C.C. 473: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

56.250.
Entry or survey of lands previously patented unlawful.

No person shall knowingly enter or have surveyed for patent, and no surveyor shall knowingly survey or certify for patent, any land that has previously, in whole or part, been entered or surveyed for patent, or patented.

History.

4705a.

56.260.
Plats and certificates of survey, how preserved.

Plats and certificates of survey shall not be recorded, but the Secretary of State shall carefully preserve and systematically arrange them in his office, and keep a full and complete index of them.

History.

4017.

56.270.
Land warrants partly appropriated.

The Secretary of State shall deliver to the owner any land warrant in his office only partially appropriated, with an indorsement showing how much remains to be appropriated.

History.

4006.

56.280.
Incomplete records, how perfected.

The Secretary of State shall supply upon his records the omission of the Governor’s name from a patent, when the original patent, with the Governor’s signature thereto, is produced to him, showing the omission, or when it appears from official indorsements on papers in the Office of the Secretary of State or by official marginal notes that the patent was regularly issued and was delivered to the proper person.

Where any former officer in charge of the land office has omitted to affix his seal of office to an official deed, the Secretary of State may supply the omission on the original deed with the same effect as if the seal had been originally affixed.

History.

4008.

56.290.
Authentication of records.

The words “A copy attest” are sufficient authentication of any record or paper in the land office, when signed by the officer in charge of the land office or his deputy.

History.

4010.

56.300.
Land office fees.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees for services in connection with the land office:

For filing of a caveat $0.25 (2) Judgment in cases of caveat, mandamus or other action affecting the land office or the land office duties of the Secretary of State, for filing copy of $0.25 (3) Official certificate with seal of office affixed, for each patent $5.00 (4) Plat and certificate of survey, for filing and registering, and issuing and recording patent thereon $2.50 (5) Warrant, survey, grant, for copy of each $1.00 (6) Copy of any other document (per page) $0.50

Click to view

History.

4013: amend. Acts 1988, ch. 85, § 2, effective July 15, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Collection of and accounting for fees, KRS

45.260

.

Fees to be paid into treasury, KRS

41.070

,

45.260

.

56.310.
Annual report to Governor.

The Secretary of State shall report to the Governor, on or before October 10 of each year, the number of patents issued and copies supplied, and the amount of fees received therefor and paid into the State Treasury. He shall take the Treasurer’s receipt for the fees, and publish it with his report to the Governor.

History.

4011.

56.320.
Custody of books and papers.

The Secretary of State shall not allow any of the books or papers of the land office to pass into the hands of any unauthorized person or permit anyone but his deputies to have access thereto.

History.

4007.

Opinions of Attorney General.

It is not lawful to permanently remove the official seals from land warrants; however in order to make the land warrants suitable for lamination such seals may be removed so long as they are replaced so that the warrant is restored to its original condition with the exception of the intervening sheet of plastic laminate, for to hold that the removal and replacement constitutes an unlawful alteration of a public record under KRS

519.060

(1)(b) would render such restoration impossible and because a literal reading of subsection (1)(b) of KRS

519.060

would defeat the legislative policy of preserving these warrants it cannot stand to prevent temporary removal of these seals and the subsequent replacement.

OAG 77-516

.